Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.065

Mental condition evaluations—Reports and recommendations required—Discharge of defendant when determined competent to stand trial.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1)(a)(i) The expert conducting the evaluation shall provide his or her report and recommendation to the court in which the criminal proceeding is pending. For a competency evaluation of a defendant who is released from custody, if the evaluation cannot be completed within twenty-one days due to a lack of cooperation by the defendant, the evaluator shall notify the court that he or she is unable to complete the evaluation because of such lack of cooperation.

(ii) A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to the designated crisis responder, the prosecuting attorney, the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(iv) of this subsection. Upon request, the evaluator shall also provide copies of any source documents relevant to the evaluation to the designated crisis responder.

(iii) Any facility providing inpatient services related to competency shall discharge the defendant as soon as the facility determines that the defendant is competent to stand trial. Discharge shall not be postponed during the writing and distribution of the evaluation report. Distribution of an evaluation report by a facility providing inpatient services shall ordinarily be accomplished within two working days or less following the final evaluation of the defendant. If the defendant is discharged to the custody of a local correctional facility, the local correctional facility must continue the medication regimen prescribed by the facility, when clinically appropriate, unless the defendant refuses to cooperate with medication and an involuntary medication order by the court has not been entered.

(iv) If there is no professional person at the local correctional facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, a professional person at the behavioral health administrative services organization to receive the report and recommendation.

(v) Upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the local correctional facility, the local correctional facility must notify the evaluator of the name of the professional person, or person designated under (a)(iv) of this subsection, to receive the report and recommendation.

(b) If the evaluator concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the person should be evaluated by a designated crisis responder under chapter 71.05 RCW, the court shall order such evaluation be conducted prior to release from confinement when the person is acquitted or convicted and sentenced to confinement for twenty-four months or less, or when charges are dismissed pursuant to a finding of incompetent to stand trial.

(2) The designated crisis responder shall provide written notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW. The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of any proceedings commenced by the designated crisis responder under subsection (2) of this section to the secretary.

(4) A facility conducting a civil commitment evaluation under RCW 10.77.086(7) or 10.77.088(6)(b) that makes a determination to release the person instead of filing a civil commitment petition must provide written notice to the prosecutor and defense attorney at least twenty-four hours prior to release. The notice may be given by email, facsimile, or other means reasonably likely to communicate the information immediately.

(5) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

[ 2023 c 453 s 20; 2019 c 325 s 5006; 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 409; 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 16. Prior: 2014 c 225 s 59; 2014 c 10 s 3; 2013 c 214 s 1; 2012 c 256 s 4; 2008 c 213 s 1; 2000 c 74 s 2; 1998 c 297 s 35.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.

Effective date—2019 c 325: See note following RCW 71.24.011.

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Finding—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.

Effective dates—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.

Effective date—2014 c 225: See note following RCW 71.24.016.

Finding—2014 c 10: See note following RCW 10.77.092.

Purpose—Effective date—2012 c 256: See notes following RCW 10.77.068.

Severability—2000 c 74: See note following RCW 10.77.060.

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.